Utah statutes.
63G-12-204.   Obtaining a permit -- Uses of permit.

(1)  An undocumented individual shall obtain a permit:

(a)  before providing services to a person in this state under a contract for hire; or

(b)  in accordance with Subsection (2), by no later than 30 days from the day on which the undocumented individual enters into a contract for hire.

(2) (a)  By rule made in accordance with Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall provide a procedure under which a person may hire an undocumented individual who does not hold a permit pending the undocumented individual obtaining a permit within 30 days of the day on which the undocumented individual is hired to provide services.

(b)  An undocumented individual may not provide services under a contract for hire to a person for more than 30 days during a two-year calendar period without obtaining a permit as provided under this part.

(3)  Subject to Subsection (4), a permit is considered an identification document for purposes of Section 63G-12-401, and may be used as identification or proof of the permit holder's age for any state or local government required purpose.

(4)  An undocumented individual may not use a permit:

(a)  to establish entitlement to a federal, state, or local benefit as described in Section 63G-12-402; or

(b)  to obtain work or provide services in a state other than Utah.



Enacted by Chapter 18, 2011 General Session

